Maryland, session 2025, HB0779.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
9–618.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0779*

HOUSE BILL 779
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CLINICAL SERVICES MANAGEMENT TEAM” MEANS A TEAM
CONSISTING OF THE DIRECTOR OF MENTAL HEALTH, THE DEPUTY DIRECTOR OF
MENTAL HEALTH, THE CHIEF MEDICAL OFFICER, THE DEPUTY CHIEF MEDICAL
OFFICER, AND THE DIRECTOR OF NURSING OF THE DEPARTMENT.
(3) “COMMITTEE” MEANS A MEDICATION REVIEW COMMITTEE
ESTABLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION THAT CONVENES TO DETERMINE
WHETHER TO APPROVE THE ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION ON
A NONEMERGENCY BASIS TO AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO REFUSES TO
ACCEPT PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION AS PRESCRIBED.
(4) “LAY ADVISOR” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WITHIN THE
DEPARTMENT WHO IS KNOWLEDGEABLE ABOUT MENTAL HEALTH PRACTICE AND
CAN ASSIST INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WITH UNDERSTANDING THE PROCESS
OUTLINED IN THIS SECTION.
(5) “LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH INFIRMARY” MEANS A DESIGNATED
UNIT WITHIN A STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY THAT IS LICENSED BY THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AS A MENTAL HEALTH INFIRMARY.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES.
(C) PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION MAY NOT BE ADMINISTERED TO AN
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO REFUSES THE MEDICATION, EXCEPT:
(1) IN AN EMERGENCY, ON THE ORDER OF A PRACTITIONER WHEN
THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL PRESENTS A DANGER TO THE LIFE OR SAFETY OF
SELF OR OTHERS; OR
(2) IN A NONEMERGENCY, IF THE TREATING PRACTITIONER HAS
RECOMMENDED THE INVOLUNTARY ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC
MEDICATION BECAUSE:
(I) THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS SUFFERING FROM A
MENTAL DISORDER RESULTING IN BEHAVIOR THAT CREATES A LIKELIHOOD OF
SERIOUS HARM TO SELF OR OTHERS;
(II) THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL HAS REFUSED TO GIVE
INFORMED CONSENT TO THE ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION;

HOUSE BILL 779 3
(III) OTHER TREATMENT MODALITIES, INCLUDING
ENCOURAGING VOLUNTARY MEDICATION COMPLIANCE, HAVE BEEN ATTEMPTED
AND DOCUMENTED IN THE MEDICAL RECORD;
(IV) THE USE OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION IS CLINICALLY
INDICATED AS THE MOST APPROPRIATE TREATMENT FOR THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S CONDITION ACCORDING TO CURRENT PRACTICE FOR RESTORING OR
PREVENTING FURTHER DETERIORATION OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S
MENTAL OR PHYSICAL HEALTH; AND
(V) A COMMITTEE HAS DETERMINED, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, THAT PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION SHOULD BE
ADMINISTERED OVER THE OBJECTION OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL.
(D) (1) A COMMITTEE SHALL CONSIST OF THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS
APPOINTED BY THE DIRECTOR OF MENTAL HEALTH FOR THE DEPARTMENT OR THE
DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE:
(I) THE CHIEF PSYCHIATRIST FOR THE REGION WHERE THE
LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH INFIRMARY IS LOCATED;
(II) ANOTHER PSYCHIATRIST; AND
(III) A MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL WHO IS NOT A
PHYSICIAN.
(2) THE DIRECTOR OF MENTAL HEALTH OR THE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE SHALL APPOINT A CHAIR OF THE COMMITTEE FROM AMONG ITS
MEMBERSHIP.
(3) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS DIRECTLY RESPONSIBLE FOR
IMPLEMENTING THE TREATMENT PLAN FOR THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
UNDER REVIEW MAY NOT SERVE AS A MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE.
(E) THE DIRECTOR OF MENTAL HEALTH OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE
SHALL ASSIGN AN IMPARTIAL LAY ADVISOR TO ASSIST THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL WITH THE PROCESS SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION.
(F) THE DIRECTOR OF MENTAL HEALTH OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE
SHALL GIVE THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL AND THE LAY ADVISOR WRITTEN
NOTICE AT LEAST 5 BUSINESS DAYS BEFORE CONVENING THE COMMITTEE THAT
SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:

HOUSE BILL 779
(1) THE DATE, TIME, AND LOCATION OF THE SCHEDULED COMMITTEE
MEETING;
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE COMMITTEE; AND
(3) A COMPLETE DESCRIPTION OF THE RIGHTS OF AN INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) IN CONNECTION WITH THE CONVENING OF A COMMITTEE, AN
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL HAS THE RIGHT TO:
(1) ATTEND THE COMMITTEE MEETING, EXCEPT FOR THE DISCUSSION
CONDUCTED TO ARRIVE AT A DECISION;
(2) PRESENT INFORMATION, INCLUDING WITNESSES;
(3) ASK QUESTIONS OF ANY PERSON PRESENTING INFORMATION TO
THE COMMITTEE;
(4) REQUEST ASSISTANCE FROM A LAY ADVISOR; AND
(5) BE INFORMED OF:
(I) THE IDENTITY OF THE ASSIGNED LAY ADVISOR;
(II) THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S DIAGNOSIS; AND
(III) THE CLINICAL NEED FOR THE PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION,
INCLUDING POTENTIAL SIDE EFFECTS AND MATERIAL RISKS AND BENEFITS OF
TAKING OR REFUSING THE MEDICATION.
(H) THE CHAIR OF A COMMITTEE MAY:
(1) POSTPONE OR CONTINUE THE COMMITTEE FOR GOOD CAUSE, FOR
UP TO 7 DAYS; AND
(2) TAKE APPROPRIATE MEASURES NECESSARY TO CONDUCT THE
COMMITTEE IN AN ORDERLY MANNER.
(I) (1) BEFORE A COMMITTEE MEETS, THE TREATING PSYCHIATRIC
PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE A DETAILED REPORT OF THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S MEDICAL RECORD TO INCLUDE:

HOUSE BILL 779 5
(I) THE BASIS FOR THE REQUEST TO ADMINISTER
PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATIONS ON A NONEMERGENCY BASIS;
(II) THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S DIAGNOSIS, DISTURBED
BEHAVIORS OBSERVED, AND CURRENT MENTAL STATUS;
(III) A DESCRIPTION OF DAILY FUNCTIONING;
(IV) RECOMMENDED PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION;
(V) METHODS USED TO ENCOURAGE VOLUNTARY MEDICATION
ADHERENCE;
(VI) VOLUNTARY AND INVOLUNTARY MEDICATION HISTORY;
AND
(VII) A DESCRIPTION OF THE LESS INTRUSIVE TREATMENT
ALTERNATIVES CONSIDERED OR ATTEMPTED.
(2) THE REPORT SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE COMMITTEE
MEMBERS NOT LESS THAN 72 HOURS BEFORE THE COMMITTEE IS TO MEET.
(J) BEFORE DETERMINING WHETHER TO APPROVE THE ADMINISTRATION
OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION, THE COMMITTEE SHALL:
(1) REVIEW THE REPORT GENERATED BY THE TREATING
PSYCHIATRIC PROVIDER UNDER SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) MEET FOR THE PURPOSE OF RECEIVING INFORMATION AND
CLINICALLY ASSESSING THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S NEED FOR MEDICATION
BY:
(I) CONSULTING WITH THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
REGARDING THE REASON FOR REFUSING THE PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION
PRESCRIBED AND THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S WILLINGNESS TO ACCEPT
ALTERNATIVE TREATMENT, INCLUDING OTHER MEDICATION;
(II) CONSULTING WITH THE TREATING CLINICIANS WHO ARE
RESPONSIBLE FOR INITIATING AND IMPLEMENTING THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S TREATMENT PLAN ABOUT THE CURRENT TREATMENT PLAN AND
ALTERNATIVE MODES OF TREATMENT, INCLUDING MEDICATIONS, THAT HAVE BEEN
CONSIDERED;

HOUSE BILL 779
(III) RECEIVING INFORMATION PRESENTED BY THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL AND OTHER INDIVIDUALS PARTICIPATING IN THE
COMMITTEE;
(IV) PROVIDING THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WITH AN
OPPORTUNITY TO ASK QUESTIONS OF ANYONE PRESENTING INFORMATION TO THE
COMMITTEE; AND
(V) REVIEWING THE CONSEQUENCES OF REQUIRING THE
ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION AND THE CONSEQUENCES OF
CONTINUED REFUSAL OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION.
(K) THE COMMITTEE MAY APPROVE THE ADMINISTRATION OF
PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION AND MAY RECOMMEND AND APPROVE ALTERNATIVE
MEDICATIONS, IF THE COMMITTEE DETERMINES THAT:
(1) THE MEDICATION IS PRESCRIBED BY A PSYCHIATRIC PROVIDER
FOR THE PURPOSE OF TREATING THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S MENTAL
DISORDER;
(2) THE ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION
REPRESENTS A REASONABLE EXERCISE OF PROFESSIONAL JUDGMENT; AND
(3) WITHOUT THE MEDICATION, THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS
AT SUBSTANTIAL RISK OF CONTINUED SELF–HARM AND DANGEROUS BEHAVIORS
RESULTING FROM THE INDIVIDUAL:
(I) REMAINING SERIOUSLY MENTALLY ILL WITH NO
SIGNIFICANT RELIEF OF THE PSYCHIATRIC SYMPTOMS THAT:
1. CAUSE THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL TO BE A
DANGER TO SELF OR OTHERS WHILE IN THE LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH INFIRMARY;
OR
2. WOULD CAUSE THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL TO
BE A CONTINUED DANGER TO SELF AND OTHER INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS IF
DISCHARGED FROM THE LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH INFIRMARY; OR
(II) RELAPSING INTO A CONDITION IN WHICH THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS UNABLE TO PROVIDE FOR THE INDIVIDUAL’S OWN
ESSENTIAL HUMAN NEEDS OF HEALTH AND SAFETY.

HOUSE BILL 779 7
(L) (1) A COMMITTEE SHALL BASE ITS DECISION ON ITS CLINICAL
ASSESSMENT OF THE INFORMATION CONTAINED IN THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S RECORD AND INFORMATION PRESENTED TO THE COMMITTEE.
(2) A COMMITTEE SHALL MEET PRIVATELY TO RENDER A DECISION.
(M) (1) THE COMMITTEE SHALL DOCUMENT ITS CONSIDERATION OF THE
ISSUES AND THE BASIS FOR ITS DECISION ON THE ADMINISTRATION OF
PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION.
(2) THE COMMITTEE SHALL PROVIDE A WRITTEN DECISION ON THE
ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION, WHICH SHALL BE PROVIDED TO
THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL, THE LAY ADVISOR, AND THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S TREATMENT TEAM FOR INCLUSION IN THE MEDICAL RECORD.
(3) IF A COMMITTEE APPROVES THE ADMINISTRATION OF
PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION, THE DECISION SHALL SPECIFY:
(I) THE PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION APPROVED AND THE
DOSAGE AND FREQUENCY RANGE;
(II) THE DURATION OF THE APPROVAL, NOT TO EXCEED THE
MAXIMUM TIME ALLOWED UNDER SUBSECTION (P) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) THE REASON THAT ALTERNATIVE TREATMENTS, INCLUDING
OTHER MEDICATION, WERE REJECTED BY THE COMMITTEE.
(4) IF A COMMITTEE APPROVES THE ADMINISTRATION OF
PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION, THE DECISION SHALL CONTAIN NOTICE OF THE RIGHT
TO REQUEST AN ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW UNDER SUBSECTION (O) OF THIS
SECTION.
(N) IF A COMMITTEE APPROVES THE ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC
MEDICATION, THE LAY ADVISOR PROMPTLY SHALL:
(1) INFORM THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OF THE RIGHT TO SEEK
ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW OF THE DECISION UNDER SUBSECTION (O) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(2) ADVISE THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OF THE PROVISION FOR
RENEWAL OF AN APPROVAL UNDER SUBSECTION (P) OF THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 779
(O) (1) AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL MAY REQUEST AN
ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW BY THE CLINICAL SERVICES MANAGEMENT TEAM WITHIN
2 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE DECISION OF THE COMMITTEE.
(2) WITHIN 1 BUSINESS DAY AFTER RECEIPT OF A REQUEST FOR AN
ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW, THE LAY ADVISOR SHALL FORWARD THE REQUEST TO
THE CLINICAL SERVICES MANAGEMENT TEAM.
(3) (I) AN INITIAL COMMITTEE DECISION AUTHORIZING THE
ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION SHALL BE STAYED FOR 2
BUSINESS DAYS.
(II) IF A REQUEST FOR ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW IS FILED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE STAY SHALL REMAIN IN EFFECT UNTIL THE
ISSUANCE OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE DECISION.
(4) THE CLINICAL SERVICES MANAGEMENT TEAM SHALL ISSUE A
DECISION WITHIN 7 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER THE DECISION BY THE COMMITTEE.
(5) THE TREATING CLINICAL TEAM SHALL IMPLEMENT IMMEDIATELY
ON RECEIPT THE DECISION OF THE CLINICAL SERVICES MANAGEMENT TEAM.
(P) (1) ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE APPROVED FOR LONGER THAN 90
DAYS.
(2) (I) BEFORE EXPIRATION OF AN APPROVAL PERIOD UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
CONTINUES TO REFUSE PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION, A COMMITTEE MAY BE
CONVENED TO DECIDE WHETHER RENEWAL IS WARRANTED.
(II) IF A COMMITTEE APPROVES THE RENEWAL OF THE
ADMINISTRATION OF PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION, THE ADMINISTRATION OF
MEDICATION NEED NOT BE INTERRUPTED WHEN THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
REQUESTS ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW OF THE RENEWAL.
(Q) WHEN PSYCHOTROPIC MEDICATION IS ORDERED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION, NOT LESS FREQUENTLY THAN EVERY 15 DAYS, THE TREATING
PHYSICIAN SHALL DOCUMENT ANY KNOWN BENEFITS OF TAKING THE MEDICATION
TO THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL AND SIDE EFFECTS OF THE MEDICATION THAT
AFFECT THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.